Washington statutes.
RCW 35.33.141

Report of expenditures and liabilities against budget appropriations.

At such intervals as may be required by city charter or city or town ordinance, however, being not less than quarterly, the clerk shall submit to the city's or town's legislative body and chief administrative officer a report showing the expenditures and liabilities against each separate budget appropriation incurred during the preceding reporting period and like information for the whole of the current fiscal year to the first day of the current reporting period together with the unexpended balance of each appropriation. The report shall also show the receipts from all sources.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 95 s 21.]